Washington statutes.
RCW 36.18.022

Filing fees may be waived—When.

The court may waive the filing fees provided for under RCW 36.18.016(2)(b) and 36.18.020(2) (a) and (b) upon affidavit by a party that the party is unable to pay the fee due to financial hardship.

[ 2005 c 374 s 6; 1995 c 292 s 16; 1992 c 54 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1992 c 54: See note following RCW 36.18.020.